Idaho, session 2025, H0375.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 46, Title 63, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 46
LOCAL OPTION SALES AND USE TAX ACT
63-4601. LOCAL OPTION SALES AND USE TAX. (1) A city or county may levy
a local option sales and use tax within its authorized jurisdiction as pro-
vided in this chapter.
(2) The qualified electors of a city or county shall have the legal
authority to authorize the city council or board of county commissioners
to adopt, implement, and collect a tax on the sale and use of any category
of products or services that the city or county chooses that are offered
for sale within the boundaries of the city or county, as long as such tax is
applied uniformly within each category subject to the tax. The city coun-
cil or board shall have the power and authority to adopt and collect a tax
if approved by a majority of all votes cast by the qualified electors of
the city or county voting in an election conducted for that purpose held in
an even-numbered year on the November election date specified in section
34-106, Idaho Code. No city or county sales and use tax proposal may be pre-


sented to city or county voters for approval or modification for a period of
fifty-one (51) weeks after an election to approve or disapprove such tax.
(3) The rate of the tax shall be the amount approved by the electors but
no more than two percent (2%) of the sales price of a product or service sub-
ject to the tax.
(4) The revenues generated by a tax as provided in this chapter, after
the necessary costs of collection and administration and distribution of any
refund or credits authorized pursuant to section 63-4604(2), Idaho Code, may
only be used to pay for the services that the city or county identifies in
the ballot question presented to the voters of the city or county pursuant to
section 63-4603, Idaho Code.
(5) The actual amount of sales and use tax revenues authorized under
this section shall be deducted from the property tax budget limitation set
forth in section 63-802, Idaho Code, for the county and each taxing district
within the county receiving such sales and use tax revenues.
63-4602. PROCEDURES. (1) Prior to the imposition of a local option
sales and use tax under this chapter, the city or county shall conduct at
least one (1) public hearing.
(2) Notice of the hearing shall be posted at least thirty (30) days
prior to the hearing at a conspicuous place within the jurisdiction of the
city or county proposing the tax. A copy of the notice shall also be pub-
lished weekly during the thirty (30) days prior to the hearing, pursuant to
the provisions of sections 60-106 and 60-106A, Idaho Code. The place, hour,
and date of the hearing shall be specified in the notice, as well as the place
where the details regarding the proposal may be examined prior to the hear-
ing. A summary of the proposal shall be published with and as a part of the
notice of publication of the notice of hearing.
(3) Following the public hearing, the city council or board of county
commissioners shall adopt an ordinance to impose the tax following autho-
rization by a majority of all votes cast by the qualified electors of the city
or county voting to impose the tax. The ordinance shall clearly identify all
information provided in section 63-4603(1), Idaho Code. The county clerk
shall then order an election to be held on a November date authorized pur-
suant to section 34-106, Idaho Code, in the next even-numbered year.
63-4603. ELECTION TO AUTHORIZE LOCAL OPTION SALES AND USE TAX. (1) In
an election, the question presented to the qualified electors of the city or
county shall:
(a) Provide a description and general explanation of the tax to be ap-
proved, including the proposed duration, which shall be no longer than
four (4) years;
(b) Provide a detailed summary of the ordinance adopted by the council
or board following the public hearing;
(c) Provide a detailed summary that clearly identifies all products and
services that shall be subject to the proposed tax;
(d) State the rate of the tax to be assessed, which shall be at least
one-tenth of one percent (0.10%) but not more than two percent (2%) of
the sales price of an item subject to taxation;


(e) State the exact purpose or purposes for which the revenues derived
from the tax shall be used; and
(f) State that the local option sales and use tax may be repealed, ex-
tended, or changed if proposed by the city or county and approved by
a simple majority of the electors pursuant to section 63-4605, Idaho
Code.
(2) Upon voter approval of the tax, the city or county shall provide by
ordinance the rate of the tax approved and the methods for reporting and col-
lecting the taxes due and shall transmit a copy of the ordinance to the state
tax commission.
(3) Tax collection shall commence on a date set forth in the ordinance,
but no earlier than the next quarter that commences at least sixty (60) days
after the date of the election.
63-4604. COLLECTION, ADMINISTRATION, AND DISTRIBUTION OF CITY AND
COUNTY SALES AND USE TAXES. (1) A city or county that has levied a tax pur-
suant to this chapter shall contract with the state tax commission for the
collection and administration of the tax in like manner and under defini-
tions and rules of the state tax commission for the collection and admin-
istration of the state sales and use tax under chapter 36, title 63, Idaho
Code, unless any such definition or rule conflicts with the city or county
ordinance providing for the local option tax, in which case the provisions
of the ordinance shall control. The state tax commission is authorized to
adopt additional rules, subject to legislative approval, as may be necessary
for efficient and effective tax collection and administration under this
chapter, including, without limitation, rules for establishing whether the
seller is located within the county, as are compatible with chapter 36, ti-
tle 63, Idaho Code, and use tax credit rules as are compatible with section
63-3701, Idaho Code.
(2) All revenues collected by the state tax commission pursuant to this
chapter shall be distributed as follows:
(a) An amount shall be distributed to the state refund account suffi-
cient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the state
tax commission to be paid shall be paid through the state refund account
and those moneys are continuously appropriated.
(b) An amount shall be distributed to the state tax commission equal to
the fee as may be agreed upon between the state tax commission and the
city or county for the actual cost of the collection and administration
of the tax. Any unencumbered balance in excess of the actual cost at the
end of the fiscal year shall be distributed as provided in paragraphs
(c) and (d) of this subsection.
(c) Fifty percent (50%) of all moneys remaining after the distributions
required by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall be placed
by the state controller in a fund designated by the state controller and
remitted monthly to the city or county that adopted the tax.
(d) Fifty percent (50%) of all moneys remaining after the distributions
required by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall be placed
by the state controller in a fund designated by the state controller and
remitted monthly as follows:


(i) If the entity adopting the tax is a city, then to the county in
which the city is located; and
(ii) If the entity adopting the tax is a county, then to each city
within the county's boundaries on a pro rata basis in proportion
to the population of each city within the boundaries of the county
adopting the tax.
63-4605. TAX REPEAL, REAUTHORIZATION, OR RATE CHANGE. The tax or the
rate of tax in effect may be changed, repealed, or extended only if approved
by a majority of all votes cast by the qualified electors voting in a repeal,
reauthorization, or rate change election conducted for such purpose. This
election may be held in any year prior to the expiration of the term of the
tax then in effect on the November election date specified in section 34-106,
Idaho Code, in an even-numbered year. A summary of the plan adopted by the
council or board with respect to the extension of the term of the tax in ques-
tion shall be included. If the repeal, extension, or rate change of the lo-
cal option sales and use tax is authorized by the voters, the city council or
board of county commissioners shall notify the state tax commission.
SECTION 2. That Section 50-1044, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 10, Title 50, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 50-1044, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
50-1044. AUTHORITY FOR RESORT CITY RESIDENTS TO APPROVE AND RESORT
CITY GOVERNMENTS TO ADOPT, IMPLEMENT, AND COLLECT CERTAIN CITY NONPROPERTY
TAXES. (1) Subject to the limitations provided in subsection (2) of this
section, the voters of any resort city with a population not in excess of
ten thousand (10,000) according to the most recent census within the state
of Idaho, organized under the general laws of the state, special charter,
or a general incorporation act, are hereby given the freedom to authorize
their city government to adopt, implement, and collect one (1) or more local
option nonproperty taxes as provided in this section. A resort city is a city
that derives the major portion of its economic well-being from businesses
catering to recreational needs and meeting needs of people traveling to that
destination city for an extended period of time. The corporate authorities
of any such resort city are hereby given the freedom and authority to adopt,
implement, and collect one (1) or more local option nonproperty taxes as
provided in this section, if approved by the required majority of city voters
voting in an election as provided in this section. No local option nonprop-
erty tax proposal may be presented to resort city voters for approval or
modification for a period of eleven (11) months after an election to approve
or disapprove such tax. The election may be a special election conducted
for the exclusive purpose of approving or disapproving such tax or may be
conducted as a part of any other special or general city election.
(2) No resort city shall have the authority to adopt any tax provided in
this section after January 1, 2027. Any tax levied by an auditorium district
pursuant to this section that was adopted before January 1, 2027, shall ex-
pire no later than January 1, 2031.


SECTION 4. That Section 67-4917B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 49, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-4917B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-4917B. HOTEL AND MOTEL ROOM SALES TAX. (1) Subject to the limita-
tions provided in subsection (2) of this section, the board shall have power
and authority to levy a sales tax of no more than five percent (5%) of the
receipts derived by hotels and motels within the district from the furnish-
ing of hotel and motel rooms, except no tax shall be imposed where residence
therein is maintained continuously under the terms of a lease or similar
agreement for a period in excess of thirty (30) days, and except that no tax
shall be charged on the sale of rooms by the Idaho Ronald McDonald House; pro-
vided that for any auditorium district established after July 1, 2001, such
sales tax shall not exceed the maximum tax rate authorized in the petition.
The levy and collection of sales tax pursuant to this section shall not be
subject to the limitations or other provisions of sections 67-4913, 67-4914,
67-4915, and 67-4916, Idaho Code. The revenues received by the district
from such sales tax shall be deposited in the depository of the district.
Promptly following the adoption by the board of the resolution to levy such
tax, the secretary of the board shall certify to the state tax commission
that such levy has been adopted and shall state the effective date thereof
and shall transmit to the commission a certified copy of such resolution.
The effective date of any such levy shall not be earlier than the first day of
the month and not less than sixty (60) days following certification of such
levy to the commission.
(2) No board shall have the authority to adopt any tax provided in this
section after January 1, 2027. Any tax levied by an auditorium district pur-
suant to this section that was adopted before January 1, 2027, shall expire
no later than January 1, 2031.
SECTION 6. This act shall be in full force and effect upon certifica-
tion of the approval by the people of the state of Idaho, at the 2026 general
election, of a constitutional amendment that provides that the Legislature
may authorize any county, city, town, or other municipal corporation to levy
a sales and use tax within its jurisdiction, as long as such tax is approved
by a majority vote of the qualified electors within the jurisdiction and the
ballot measure for approval includes a detailed description of the products
and services that shall be subject to the tax; a detailed description of the
intended purposes for the revenue; a set termination date not exceeding four
years; and a maximum tax rate of two percent of the sales price of a product
or service subject to the tax; and that further provides that no other sales
or use taxes may be established by any county, city, town, municipal corpo-
ration, taxing district, taxing unit, or other local government entity other
than the sales or use tax authorized by such entity.